Maryland, session 2025, HB0544.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
3–203.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION, “OFFENSIVE CONTACT” MEANS
NONCONSENSUAL PHYSICAL CONTACT THAT A REASONABLE PERSON WOULD FIND
TO BE OFFENSIVE.
(2) “OFFENSIVE CONTACT” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) CONTACT THAT RESULTS IN PHYSICAL INJURY;
(II) CONTACT THAT CAUSES A RISK OF SERIOUS PHYSICAL
INJURY;
(III) A DOMESTICALLY RELATED CRIME, AS DEFINED IN § 6–233
OF THE CRIMINAL PROCEDURE ARTICLE; OR
(IV) A SEXUAL CRIME UNDER SUBTITLE 3 OF THIS TITLE.
(B) A PERSON MAY NOT:
(1) INTENTIONALLY CAUSE OFFENSIVE CONTACT;
(2) ENGAGE IN CONDUCT INTENDING TO PUT ANOTHER IN FEAR OF
OFFENSIVE CONTACT; OR
(3) ATTEMPT TO CAUSE OFFENSIVE CONTACT.
(C) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS GUILTY OF THE
MISDEMEANOR OF ASSAULT IN THE THIRD DEGREE AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT
TO IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 90 DAYS OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $500 OR
BOTH.

HOUSE BILL 544 3
3–206.
(a) An indictment, information, other charging document, or warrant for a crime
described in § 3–202, § 3–203, or § 3–205 of this subtitle is sufficient if it substantially
states:
“(name of defendant) on (date) in (county) assaulted (name of victim) in the........
degree or (describe other violation) in violation of (section violated) against the peace,
government, and dignity of the State.”.
(b) If the general form of indictment or information described in subsection (a) of
this section is used to charge a crime described in § 3–202, § 3–203, or § 3–205 of this
subtitle in a case in the circuit court, the defendant, on timely demand, is entitled to a bill
of particulars.
(c) A charge of assault in the first degree also charges a defendant with assault
in the second degree.
(D) (1) UNLESS SPECIFICALLY CHARGED BY THE STATE, ASSAULT IN THE
THIRD DEGREE UNDER § 3–203.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE IS NOT A LESSER INCLUDED
CRIME OF ANY OTHER CRIME.
(2) A CHARGING DOCUMENT OR WARRANT FOR A CRIME DESCRIBED
IN § 3–203.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE IS SUFFICIENT IF IT SUBSTANTIALLY STATES:
“(NAME OF DEFENDANT) ON (DATE) IN (COUNTY) COMMITTED ASSAULT IN THE
THIRD DEGREE AGAINST (NAME OF VICTIM) IN VIOLATION OF § 3–203.1 OF THE
CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE AGAINST THE PEACE, GOVERNMENT, AND DIGNITY OF THE
STATE.”.
[(d)] (E) (1) To be found guilty of reckless endangerment under § 3–204 of
this subtitle, a defendant must be charged specifically with reckless endangerment.
(2) A charging document for reckless endangerment under § 3–204 of this
subtitle is sufficient if it substantially states:
“(name of defendant) on (date) in (county) committed reckless endangerment in
violation of § 3–204 of the Criminal Law Article against the peace, government, and dignity
of the State.”.
(3) If more than one individual is endangered by the conduct of the
defendant, a separate charge may be brought for each individual endangered.
(4) A charging document containing a charge of reckless endangerment
under § 3–204 of this subtitle may:

HOUSE BILL 544
(i) include a count for each individual endangered by the conduct of
the defendant; or
(ii) contain a single count based on the conduct of the defendant,
regardless of the number of individuals endangered by the conduct of the defendant.
(5) If the general form of charging document described in paragraph (2) of
this subsection is used to charge reckless endangerment under § 3–204 of this subtitle in a
case in the circuit court, the defendant, on timely demand, is entitled to a bill of particulars.
3–209.
(a) Subject to [subsection] SUBSECTIONS (b) AND (C) of this section, a person
charged with a crime under § 3–202, § 3–203, § 3–203.1, § 3–204, or § 3–205 of this subtitle
may assert any judicially recognized defense.
(b) The discovery or perception of, or belief about, another person’s race, color,
national origin, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, religious beliefs, or disability,
whether or not accurate, is not a defense to the crime of assault in any degree.
(C) A PHYSICAL INJURY OF A VICTIM RESULTING FROM A VIOLATION OF §
3–203.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE IS NOT A DEFENSE TO A CHARGE UNDER § 3–203.1 OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
4–301.
(b) Except as provided in § 4–302 of this subtitle, the District Court also has
exclusive original jurisdiction in a criminal case in which a person at least 18 years old or
a corporation is charged with:
(1) Commission of a common–law or statutory misdemeanor regardless of
the amount of money or value of the property involved;
(2) Violation of § 7–104, § 7–105, § 7–107, or § 7–108 of the Criminal Law
Article, whether a felony or a misdemeanor;
(3) Violation of a county, municipal, or other ordinance, if the violation is
not a felony;
(4) Criminal violation of a State, county, or municipal rule or regulation, if
the violation is not a felony;
(5) Doing or omitting to do any act made punishable by a fine,
imprisonment, or other penalty as provided by the particular law, ordinance, rule, or
regulation defining the violation if the violation is not a felony;

HOUSE BILL 544 5
(6) Violation of § 8–103 of the Criminal Law Article, whether a felony or a
misdemeanor;
(7) Violation of § 8–203, § 8–204, § 8–205, § 8–206, § 8–207, § 8–208, or §
8–209 of the Criminal Law Article, whether a felony or misdemeanor;
(8) Forgery or violation of Title 8, Subtitle 6 of the Criminal Law Article,
whether a felony or misdemeanor;
(9) Violation of Title 27, Subtitle 4 of the Insurance Article, whether a
felony or a misdemeanor;
(10) Violation of § 9–1106 of the Labor and Employment Article;
(11) Violation of § 8–301 of the Criminal Law Article, whether a felony or
misdemeanor;
(12) Violation of § 2–209 of the Criminal Law Article;
(13) Violation of Title 2, Subtitle 5 of the Criminal Law Article;
(14) Violation of Title 11, Subtitle 5 of the Financial Institutions Article;
(15) Violation of § 10–604, § 10–605, § 10–606, § 10–607, § 10–607.1, or §
10–608 of the Criminal Law Article, whether a felony or misdemeanor;
(16) Violation of Title 7, Subtitle 3, Part III of the Criminal Law Article,
whether a felony or misdemeanor;
(17) Violation of § 20–102 of the Transportation Article, whether a felony or
misdemeanor;
(18) Violation of § 8–801 of the Criminal Law Article;
(19) Violation of § 8–604 of the Criminal Law Article;
(20) Violation of Title 8, Subtitle 2, Part II of the Criminal Law Article;
(21) Violation of § 16–801, § 16–802, § 16–803, or § 16–804 of the Election
Law Article;
(22) Violation of § 3–203(c) of the Criminal Law Article;
(23) Violation of § 11–208 of the Criminal Law Article as a second or
subsequent offense;

HOUSE BILL 544
(24) Violation of § 11–721 of the Criminal Procedure Article as a second or
subsequent offense; [or]
(25) Violation of § 3–1102(b) or § 3–1103 of the Criminal Law Article; OR
(26) VIOLATION OF § 3–203.1 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE.
4–302.
(d) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the jurisdiction
of the District Court is concurrent with that of the circuit court in a criminal case:
(i) In which the penalty may be confinement for 3 years or more or
a fine of $2,500 or more; or
(ii) That is a felony, as provided in § 4–301(b)(2), (6), (7), (8), (9), (10),
(11), (12), (13), (14), (15), (16), (17), (18), (19), (20), (21), (22), (23), (24), and (25) of this
subtitle.
(2) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, a
circuit court does not have jurisdiction to try a case charging a violation of § 3–203.1, §
5–601, or § 5–620 of the Criminal Law Article.
(ii) A circuit court does have jurisdiction to try a case charging a
violation of § 3–203.1, § 5–601, or § 5–620 of the Criminal Law Article if the defendant:
1. Properly demands a jury trial;
2. Appeals as provided by law from a final judgment entered
in the District Court; or
3. Is charged with another offense arising out of the same
circumstances that is within a circuit court’s jurisdiction.
Article – Criminal Procedure
10–110.
(a) A person may file a petition listing relevant facts for expungement of a police
record, court record, or other record maintained by the State or a political subdivision of
the State if the person is convicted of:
(1) a misdemeanor that is a violation of:
(i) § 6–320 of the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis Article;

HOUSE BILL 544 7
(ii) an offense listed in § 17–613(a) of the Business Occupations and
Professions Article;
(iii) § 5–712, § 19–304, § 19–308, or Title 5, Subtitle 6 or Subtitle 9 of
the Business Regulation Article;
(iv) § 3–1508 or § 10–402 of the Courts Article;
(v) § 14–1915, § 14–2902, or § 14–2903 of the Commercial Law
Article;
(vi) § 5–211 of this article;
(vii) [§ 3–203] § 3–203.1 or § 3–808 of the Criminal Law Article;
(viii) § 5–601 not involving the use or possession of cannabis, §
5–602(b)(1), § 5–618, § 5–619, § 5–620, § 5–703, § 5–708, or § 5–902 of the Criminal Law
Article;
(ix) § 6–105, § 6–108, § 6–205 (fourth degree burglary), § 6–206, §
6–301, § 6–303, § 6–306, § 6–307, § 6–402, or § 6–503 of the Criminal Law Article;
(x) § 7–104, § 7–203, § 7–205, § 7–304, § 7–308, or § 7–309 of the
Criminal Law Article;
(xi) § 8–103, § 8–206, § 8–401, § 8–402, § 8–404, § 8–406, § 8–408, §
8–503, § 8–521, § 8–523, or § 8–904 of the Criminal Law Article;
(xii) § 9–204, § 9–205, § 9–503, or § 9–506 of the Criminal Law Article;
(xiii) § 10–110, § 10–201, § 10–402, § 10–404, or § 10–502 of the
Criminal Law Article;
(xiv) § 11–303, § 11–306, or § 11–307 of the Criminal Law Article;
(xv) § 12–102, § 12–103, § 12–104, § 12–105, § 12–109, § 12–203, §
12–204, § 12–205, or § 12–302 of the Criminal Law Article;
(xvi) § 13–401, § 13–602, or § 16–201 of the Election Law Article;
(xvii) [§ 4–509 of the Family Law Article;
(xviii)] § 18–215 of the Health – General Article;
[(xix)] (XVIII) § 4–411 or § 4–2005 of the Housing and Community
Development Article;

HOUSE BILL 544
[(xx)] (XIX) § 27–403, § 27–404, § 27–405, § 27–406, § 27–406.1, §
27–407, § 27–407.1, or § 27–407.2 of the Insurance Article;
[(xxi)] (XX) § 8–725.4, § 8–725.5, § 8–725.6, § 8–725.7, § 8–726, §
8–726.1, § 8–727.1, or § 8–738.2 of the Natural Resources Article or any prohibited act
related to speed limits for personal watercraft;
[(xxii)] (XXI) § 10–301, § 10–306, § 10–308.1, § 10–413(e)(1), §
10–418, § 10–502, § 10–611, or § 10–907(a) of the Natural Resources Article;
[(xxiii)] (XXII) § 5–307, § 5–308, § 6–602, § 7–402, or § 14–114 of
the Public Safety Article;
[(xxiv)] (XXIII) § 7–318.1, § 7–509, or § 10–507 of the Real Property
Article;
[(xxv)] (XXIV) § 9–124 of the State Government Article;
[(xxvi)] (XXV) § 13–1001, § 13–1004, § 13–1007, or § 13–1024 of
the Tax – General Article;
[(xxvii)] (XXVI) § 16–303 of the Transportation Article; or
[(xxviii)] (XXVII) the common law offenses of affray, rioting, criminal
contempt, battery, or hindering;
(c) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a petition for
expungement under this section may not be filed earlier than 5 years after the person
satisfies the sentence or sentences imposed for all convictions for which expungement is
requested, including parole, probation, or mandatory supervision.
(2) A petition for expungement for a violation of [§ 3–203 of the Criminal
Law Article or] common law battery may not be filed earlier than 7 years after the person
satisfies the sentence or sentences imposed for all convictions for which expungement is
requested, including parole, probation, or mandatory supervision.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.